Washington statutes.
RCW 42.60.040

Agreements in conflict with chapter.

Any agreements in existence on June 7, 2018, that make any state or local government agency information or database available in conflict with the terms of this chapter are terminated on that date to the extent of the conflict.

[ 2018 c 303 s 5.]